public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec2.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX A íxer ixarésimo/L [aenx]díxer
SFX A íxer ixarésimo/L [lr]íxer
SFX A íxer ixarésimoi/M [aenx]díxer
SFX A íxer ixarésimoi/M [lr]íxer
SFX A íxer ixaréu/Q [aenx]díxer
SFX A íxer ixaréu/Q [lr]íxer
SFX A íxer ixarí/P [aenx]díxer
SFX A íxer ixarí/P [lr]íxer
SFX A íxer ixaría/JLNR [aenx]díxer
SFX A íxer ixaría/JLNR [lr]íxer
SFX A íxer ixaríami/K [aenx]díxer
SFX A íxer ixaríami/K [lr]íxer
SFX A íxer ixaríatu/O [aenx]díxer
SFX A íxer ixaríatu/O [lr]íxer
SFX A íxer ixaríe/JLR [aenx]díxer
SFX A íxer ixaríe/JLR [lr]íxer
SFX A íxer ixaríelo/S [aenx]díxer
SFX A íxer ixaríelo/S [lr]íxer
SFX A íxer ixaríemi/K [aenx]díxer
SFX A íxer ixaríemi/K [lr]íxer
SFX A íxer ixarímoi/M [aenx]díxer
SFX A íxer ixarímoi/M [lr]íxer
SFX A íxer ixaríu/Q [aenx]díxer
SFX A íxer ixaríu/Q [lr]íxer
SFX A íxer ixarò/JL [aenx]díxer
SFX A íxer ixarò/JL [lr]íxer
SFX A íxer ixaròmi/K [aenx]díxer
SFX A íxer ixaròmi/K [lr]íxer
SFX A íxer ixe/IJLR íxer
SFX A íxer ixede íxer
SFX A íxer ixege íxer
SFX A íxer ixeme/H íxer
SFX A íxer ixemo/L íxer
SFX A íxer ixen/L íxer
SFX A íxer ixendo/E íxer
SFX A íxer ixene íxer
SFX A íxer ixeni/M íxer
SFX A íxer ixense íxer
SFX A íxer ixente íxer
SFX A íxer ixeralo/S íxer
SFX A íxer ixerami/K íxer
SFX A íxer ixeratu/O íxer
SFX A íxer ixerave/RT íxer
SFX A íxer ixeremo/L íxer
SFX A íxer ixeren/L íxer
SFX A íxer ixereni/M íxer
SFX A íxer ixerense íxer
SFX A íxer ixeresi/P íxer
SFX A íxer ixeresiu/Q íxer
SFX A íxer ixerimo/L íxer
SFX A íxer ixerion/L íxer
SFX A íxer ixerioni/M íxer
SFX A íxer ixerionse íxer
SFX A íxer ixerisen/L íxer
SFX A íxer ixeriseni/M íxer
SFX A íxer ixerisense íxer
SFX A íxer ixerision/L íxer
SFX A íxer ixerisioni/M íxer
SFX A íxer ixerisionse íxer
SFX A íxer ixerisié/P íxer
SFX A íxer ixerisiéu/Q íxer
SFX A íxer ixerison/L íxer
SFX A íxer ixerisoni/M íxer
SFX A íxer ixerisonse íxer
SFX A íxer ixerié/P íxer
SFX A íxer ixeriéu/Q íxer
SFX A íxer ixeron/L íxer
SFX A íxer ixeroni/M íxer
SFX A íxer ixeronse íxer
SFX A íxer ixerà/JLNR íxer
SFX A íxer ixeràe/R íxer
SFX A íxer ixerè/JL íxer
SFX A íxer ixerèmi/K íxer
SFX A íxer ixeré/P íxer
SFX A íxer ixerémoi/M íxer
SFX A íxer ixerésimo/L íxer
SFX A íxer ixerésimoi/M íxer
SFX A íxer ixeréu/Q íxer
SFX A íxer ixerí/P íxer
SFX A íxer ixería/JLNR íxer
SFX A íxer ixeríami/K íxer
SFX A íxer ixeríatu/O íxer
SFX A íxer ixeríe/JLR íxer
SFX A íxer ixeríelo/S íxer
SFX A íxer ixeríemi/K íxer
SFX A íxer ixerímoi/M íxer
SFX A íxer ixeríu/Q íxer
SFX A íxer ixerò/JL íxer
SFX A íxer ixeròmi/K íxer
SFX A íxer ixese/I íxer
SFX A íxer ixesi íxer
SFX A íxer ixesta/I íxer
SFX A íxer ixeste/I íxer
SFX A íxer ixesti/I íxer
SFX A íxer ixesto/I íxer
SFX A íxer ixeva/JLPR íxer
SFX A íxer ixeve/JL íxer
SFX A íxer ixevi/NP íxer
SFX A íxer ixevo/JL íxer
SFX A íxer ixi/FN íxer
SFX A íxer ixime/H íxer
SFX A íxer iximo/L íxer
SFX A íxer ixion/L íxer
SFX A íxer ixione íxer
SFX A íxer ixioni/M íxer
SFX A íxer ixionse íxer
SFX A íxer ixisen/L íxer
SFX A íxer ixisene íxer
SFX A íxer ixiseni/M íxer
SFX A íxer ixisense íxer
SFX A íxer ixision/L íxer
SFX A íxer ixisione íxer
SFX A íxer ixisioni/M íxer
SFX A íxer ixisionse íxer
SFX A íxer ixisié/P íxer
SFX A íxer ixisiéde/P íxer
SFX A íxer ixisiége/P íxer
SFX A íxer ixison/L íxer
SFX A íxer ixisone íxer
SFX A íxer ixisoni/M íxer
SFX A íxer ixisonse íxer
SFX A íxer ixiven/L íxer
SFX A íxer ixiveni/M íxer
SFX A íxer ixivense íxer
SFX A íxer ixivion/L íxer
SFX A íxer ixivioni/M íxer
SFX A íxer ixivionse íxer
SFX A íxer ixivié/P íxer
SFX A íxer ixiviéu/Q íxer
SFX A íxer ixivon/L íxer
SFX A íxer ixivoni/M íxer
SFX A íxer ixivonse íxer
SFX A íxer ixié/P íxer
SFX A íxer ixiéde/P íxer
SFX A íxer ixiége/P íxer
SFX A íxer ixiéu/Q íxer
SFX A íxer ixo/JL íxer
SFX A íxer ixon/L íxer
SFX A íxer ixone íxer
SFX A íxer ixoni/M íxer
SFX A íxer ixonse íxer
SFX A íxer ixuda íxer
SFX A íxer ixude íxer
SFX A íxer ixudi íxer
SFX A íxer ixudo íxer
SFX A íxer ixé/FP íxer
SFX A íxer ixéa/JLPR íxer
SFX A íxer ixéami/K íxer
SFX A íxer ixéau/Q íxer
SFX A íxer ixée/JL íxer
SFX A íxer ixéelo/S íxer
SFX A íxer ixéemi/K íxer
SFX A íxer ixéi/NP íxer
SFX A íxer ixéimo/L íxer
SFX A íxer ixéimoi/M íxer
SFX A íxer ixéitu/O íxer
SFX A íxer ixémoi/M íxer
SFX A íxer ixéndome/G íxer
SFX A íxer ixéndomene/G íxer
SFX A íxer ixéo/JL íxer
SFX A íxer ixéomi/K íxer
SFX A íxer ixésimo íxer
SFX A íxer ixéu/Q íxer
SFX A íxer ixévami/K íxer
SFX A íxer ixévau/Q íxer
SFX A íxer ixévelo/S íxer
SFX A íxer ixévemi/K íxer
SFX A íxer ixévimo/L íxer
SFX A íxer ixévimoi/M íxer
SFX A íxer ixévitu/O íxer
SFX A íxer ixévomi/K íxer
SFX A íxer ixí/FP íxer
SFX A íxer ixímoi/M íxer
SFX A íxer ixíu/Q íxer
SFX A íxer ixú íxer
SFX A íxer ixúa íxer
SFX A íxer ixúe íxer
SFX A íxer ixúi íxer
SFX A íxer ixúo íxer
SFX A íxer èta aflíxer
SFX A íxer èta xgríxer
SFX A íxer ète aflíxer
SFX A íxer ète xgríxer
SFX A íxer èti aflíxer
SFX A íxer èti xgríxer
SFX A íxer èto/I aflíxer
SFX A íxer èto/I xgríxer
SFX A íđer ita fríđer
SFX A íđer ite fríđer
SFX A íđer iti fríđer
SFX A íđer ito/I fríđer
SFX A íđer iđa fríđer
SFX A íđer iđaralo/S fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarami/K fríđer
SFX A íđer iđaratu/O fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarave/RT fríđer
SFX A íđer iđaremo/L fríđer
SFX A íđer iđaren/L fríđer
SFX A íđer iđareni/M fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarense fríđer
SFX A íđer iđaresi/P fríđer
SFX A íđer iđaresiu/Q fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarimo/L fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarion/L fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarioni/M fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarionse fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarisen/L fríđer
SFX A íđer iđariseni/M fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarisense fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarision/L fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarisioni/M fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarisionse fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarisié/P fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarisiéu/Q fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarison/L fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarisoni/M fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarisonse fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarié/P fríđer
SFX A íđer iđariéu/Q fríđer
SFX A íđer iđaron/L fríđer
SFX A íđer iđaroni/M fríđer
SFX A íđer iđaronse fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarà/JLNR fríđer
SFX A íđer iđaràe/R fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarè/JL fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarèmi/K fríđer
SFX A íđer iđaré/P fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarémoi/M fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarésimo/L fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarésimoi/M fríđer
SFX A íđer iđaréu/Q fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarí/P fríđer
SFX A íđer iđaría/JLNR fríđer
SFX A íđer iđaríami/K fríđer
SFX A íđer iđaríatu/O fríđer
SFX A íđer iđaríe/JLR fríđer
SFX A íđer iđaríelo/S fríđer
SFX A íđer iđaríemi/K fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarímoi/M fríđer
SFX A íđer iđaríu/Q fríđer
SFX A íđer iđarò/JL fríđer
SFX A íđer iđaròmi/K fríđer
SFX A íđer iđe/IJLR fríđer
SFX A íđer iđede fríđer
SFX A íđer iđege fríđer
SFX A íđer iđeme/H fríđer
SFX A íđer iđemo/L fríđer
SFX A íđer iđen/L fríđer
SFX A íđer iđendo/E fríđer
SFX A íđer iđene fríđer
SFX A íđer iđeni/M fríđer
SFX A íđer iđense fríđer
SFX A íđer iđente fríđer
SFX A íđer iđeralo/S fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerami/K fríđer
SFX A íđer iđeratu/O fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerave/RT fríđer
SFX A íđer iđeremo/L fríđer
SFX A íđer iđeren/L fríđer
SFX A íđer iđereni/M fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerense fríđer
SFX A íđer iđeresi/P fríđer
SFX A íđer iđeresiu/Q fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerimo/L fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerion/L fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerioni/M fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerionse fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerisen/L fríđer
SFX A íđer iđeriseni/M fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerisense fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerision/L fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerisioni/M fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerisionse fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerisié/P fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerisiéu/Q fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerison/L fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerisoni/M fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerisonse fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerié/P fríđer
SFX A íđer iđeriéu/Q fríđer
SFX A íđer iđeron/L fríđer
SFX A íđer iđeroni/M fríđer
SFX A íđer iđeronse fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerà/JLNR fríđer
SFX A íđer iđeràe/R fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerè/JL fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerèmi/K fríđer
SFX A íđer iđeré/P fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerémoi/M fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerésimo/L fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerésimoi/M fríđer
SFX A íđer iđeréu/Q fríđer
SFX A íđer iđerí/P fríđer
SFX A íđer iđería/JLNR fríđer
SFX A íđer iđeríami/K fríđer
SFX A íđer iđeríatu/O fríđer
SFX A íđer iđeríe/JLR fríđer
SFX A íđer iđeríelo/S fríđer
