public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec2.dic
afanar/A
albixar/A
alsar/A
‘ndar/A
ansimar/A
inarđerar/A
dexarmidar/A
subastar/A
inaŧidar/A
‘ver/A
xbadaɉar/A
inbagoƚar/A
balar/A
inbalbar/A
xbaƚonar/A
rexbalŧar/A
bandiđar/A
barar/A
xbarbar/A
barkidar/A
bastonar/A
rebatidar/A
dexbauƚar/A
xbaxir/A
xbekotar/A
bersaɉar/A
bevaŧar/A
xbiankiđar/A
xbilansar/A
xbiñar/A
bitar/A
dexbocar/A
soboɉir/A
inbokonar/A
xbolsegar/A
sorabondar/A
xbordelar/A
dexborsar/A
inbotiƚiar/A
dexbosoƚar/A
bragañar/A
dexbramegar/A
brasoƚar/A
abreviar/A
brivar/A
xbrokar/A
inbroxar/A
bruxar/A
xbufonar/A
dexbutar/A
dexbuxolar/A
carir/A
cekoƚar/A
tracèñer/A
precetar/A
cipegar/A
scupar/A
damejar/A
prodegar/A
determinar/A
prodigar/A
maledíxer/A
doƚar/A
redomandar/A
redopiar/A
dotar/A
redreŧar/A
kondúxer/A
inxaƚir/A
đavariar/A
đogatar/A
malxontar/A
sođónxer/A
đovar/A
đular/A
stradurar/A
ekuipaɉar/A
adenpir/A
adeskar/A
exasperar/A
dexasuefar/A
torefar/A
falir/A
falŧar/A
fameliarixar/A
farsir/A
fasendar/A
favorir/A
onfegar/A
efeltrir/A
ferir/A
fermentar/A
arfiar/A
fiapir/A
konfidar/A
defiƚar/A
sfiƚasar/A
fioƚar/A
desfisir/A
inafitar/A
sfodrar/A
sfoɉar/A
fondamentar/A
desformar/A
formigoƚar/A
straforsar/A
frakar/A
frànder/A
infraskar/A
sfraŧelar/A
desfregolar/A
desfríxer/A
frondedar/A
refudar/A
sfumar/A
futiñar/A
dexgaɉar/A
gaƚexar/A
xgalonar/A
dexganbarar/A
garantir/A
xgarbujar/A
xgaruɉar/A
ingavetar/A
xgiñaŧar/A
ingoloxir/A
xgorgar/A
degradar/A
ingranir/A
xgranfar/A
regrasiar/A
dexagravar/A
ingrejar/A
xgretolar/A
griñar/A
ingrisolir/A
regroar/A
ingrumar/A
guadañar/A
xguatarar/A
regurxitar/A
ilunar/A
industriar/A
inɉuriar/A
inprovixar/A
intiriŧir/A
invidiar/A
exíɉer/A
injarmar/A
injavetar/A
dexjemar/A
reɉetar/A
joŧar/A
xɉoŧolar/A
juguƚar/A
skacixar/A
inkaenasar/A
interkalar/A
kalkar/A
skalmanar/A
skalŧar/A
skaƚumar/A
skanaƚar/A
inkaneƚar/A
skanpanixar/A
skanŧelar/A
inkapeƚar/A
skapriŧiar/A
inkaratar/A
kargar/A
skarnevaƚar/A
karteđar/A
inskartoŧar/A
inkastrar/A
katastegar/A
inkatorigoƚar/A
kautar/A
kavaƚar/A
klonar/A
skokar/A
inkoƚorir/A
skomunegar/A
konpasar/A
kontrolar/A
rekórer/A
skòrđer/A
kortelar/A
skovar/A
kréser/A
kronpar/A
kruŧiar/A
deskuèrder/A
rinkuƚar/A
inkuŧolar/A
ƚanguir/A
lardar/A
lavar/A
delegar/A
deletar/A
deƚiberar/A
xlimegar/A
ƚodar/A
ƚordar/A
straƚunar/A
amaestrar/A
xmaltir/A
manipolar/A
markiar/A
inmarsir/A
matiđar/A
maxenar/A
xmeđar/A
xmenusar/A
inprométer/A
xmilŧir/A
inmobiƚiar/A
mòlder/A
xmontar/A
morsar/A
moxegar/A
premunir/A
muxonar/A
denegar/A
nisar/A
renonsiar/A
xñaolar/A
ofisiar/A
onbrixar/A
orir/A
inorpelar/A
pacugar/A
despaketar/A
inpaƚidir/A
spànder/A
papar/A
despaređar/A
inparŧialiđar/A
pastiđar/A
inpasar/A
pexorar/A
speƚakiar/A
pénđer/A
despensar/A
perlar/A
peteđolar/A
spesegar/A
piànxer/A
spierar/A
spioƚar/A
pistoƚetar/A
pixokar/A
spolpar/A
espóner/A
inpontar/A
popoƚar/A
postar/A
precixar/A
despresiar/A
provar/A
spupilar/A
rabiar/A
ranciñar/A
rasar/A
recoƚar/A
remengar/A
riduŧar/A
derivar/A
inrokir/A
interónper/A
roxegar/A
rumegar/A
saɉar/A
saƚasar/A
sangonar/A
strasaver/A
scopetar/A
segar/A
deskonsejar/A
senbrar/A
señorar/A
sevitar/A
sijilar/A
siringar/A
skandaliđar/A
inskarselar/A
skinkar/A
skòter/A
skuarsar/A
soƚeɉar/A
rasomejar/A
sortir/A
sparpaɉar/A
speronar/A
despigoƚar/A
sporkacar/A
restabilir/A
stanpar/A
sterilidar/A
instituir/A
storpiar/A
strénder/A
stropar/A
stuxar/A
suɉerir/A
sutilar/A
staɉuŧar/A
intanbuxar/A
tarmar/A
destavelar/A
preténder/A
tenporixar/A
sosteñir/A
retéñer/A
destèser/A
stirakiar/A
intoƚar/A
tonfoƚar/A
destortiɉar/A
tosegar/A
trakeɉar/A
trapoƚar/A
travaɉar/A
stridar/A
tronbetar/A
tugar/A
inŧankar/A
sekatrexar/A
senar/A
inŧercar/A
deŧervelar/A
sikoƚar/A
ŧinganar/A
sirkondar/A
insolar/A
udar/A
dexuxar/A
vaƚidar/A
soravanŧar/A
vedovar/A
velixar/A
venturar/A
dexvèñer/A
verxeƚar/A
inverigoƚar/A
verxurar/A
inviar/A
konvínŧer/A
vixiƚar/A
vokaliđar/A
involxar/A
revòlxer/A
xautar/A
inxeñar/A
xjaventar/A
xñinfexar/A
emosionar/A
recapar/A
dexsuefar/A
ingrasiar/A
resaver/A
kegar/A
injasar/A
maxnar/A
saƚar/A
sepoƚir/A
spacugar/A
deneralidar/A
arpiɉar/A
dexlonbriar/A
abituaƚe/A	po:adjective
